Massachusetts, session 194th, H4511.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Paragraph (2) of subsection (i) of section 89 of chapter 71 of the general 
laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby amended by striking out the first 2 
sentences and inserting in place thereof the following 2 sentences:-  
In any fiscal year, no public school district's total charter school tuition payment to 
commonwealth charter schools, as calculated in subsection (ff), shall exceed 9 per cent of the 
district's net school spending; provided, however, that a public school district whose total charter 
school tuition payment as of June 30, 2025, exceeds said 9 per cent shall remain at the level 
necessary to support current and previously authorized charter school enrollment, and provided 
further that no new charter school seats shall be authorized by the board for said district so long 
as its total charter school tuition payment exceeds said 9 per cent. The commonwealth shall incur 
charter school tuition payments for siblings attending commonwealth charter schools to the 
extent that their attendance would otherwise cause the school district's charter school tuition 

of 5 13 payments to exceed 9 per cent of the school district's net school spending or the higher caps 
referenced herein. 
SECTION 2. Paragraph (3) of said subsection (i) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as 
so appearing, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 218 to 223, inclusive, the words “the 
school district's total charter school tuition payment to commonwealth charter schools may 
exceed 9 per cent of the district's net school spending but shall not exceed 18 per cent. For a 
district qualifying under this paragraph whose charter school tuition payments exceed 9 per cent 
of the school district's net school spending,”. 
SECTION 3. Said paragraph (3) of said subsection (i) of said section 89 of said chapter 
71, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “school,” in line 224, 
the following words:- impacting said district.  
SECTION 4. Said paragraph (3) of said subsection (i) of said section 89 of said chapter 
71, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out the eighth sentence. 
SECTION 5. Said subsection (i) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is 
hereby further amended by striking out paragraph (4).  
SECTION 6. Subsection (j) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by inserting after the third sentence the following sentence:- The criteria shall 
include, but not be limited to: (i) the projected impact on enrollment to the sending district or 
districts; (ii) the projected financial impact on the sending district or districts; and (iii) the 
projected impact on the overall short- and long-term viability of the sending district or districts. 

of 5 33  SECTION 7. Subsection (dd) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
Any material produced by the department in relation to a charter school renewal decision 
shall be made available to the public at least 60 days prior to a vote by the board to renew a 
school’s charter. Furthermore, at least 60 days prior to a renewal vote, the board shall solicit 
public comment on the renewal for a period of at least 30 days. The board shall review all 
material submitted in support of or in opposition to the charter renewal prior to a renewal vote. In 
the event that the board delegates full or partial authority to the commissioner to make charter 
school renewal decisions, the same public notice and public comment timelines shall apply. 
SECTION 8. Said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by inserting after subsection (dd) the following subsection:-  
(dd1/2) In the case of a charter school seeking an expansion of seats from the board, there 
shall be a public hearing on the expansion if a member of the school committee in any 
potentially impacted district makes the request to the department within 30 days of public 
notification of the expansion request. The board shall hold the hearing in the school district, 
providing for the option to participate virtually, in which the proposed expansion would take 
place, in accordance with the public hearing requirements outlined in subsection (h).  
The board shall establish criteria for the approval of a charter school expansion request, 
and recommendations to the board shall be based upon and reference those criteria. The criteria 
shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the projected impact on enrollment to the sending district 
or districts; (ii) the projected financial impact on the sending district or districts; (iii) the 
projected impact on the overall short- and long-term viability of the sending district or districts; 

of 5 55 and (iv) the degree to which the charter school seeking expansion serves and demonstrates an 
intent to serve student populations representative of the sending district or districts, including but 
not limited to the categories of students enumerated in paragraph (3) of subsection (i).  
SECTION 9. Subsection (ff) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out the the fourth paragraph and inserting in place thereof the 
following 2 paragraphs:- 
For each sending district, the total tuition amount transmitted to a charter school shall be 
the per pupil tuition amount as defined above, multiplied by the total number of students 
attending the charter school from that district in the current fiscal year. Funding to cover said 
total tuition amount shall be shared by the district and state as follows: the district’s portion shall 
be the sum of (i) the per pupil facilities component and (ii) the unadjusted per pupil foundation 
budget component as calculated in paragraph 2 of this subsection, multiplied by the total number 
of students attending the charter school from that district in the current fiscal year; and the state’s 
portion shall be any above foundation rate as calculated in paragraph 3 of this subsection 
multiplied by the total number of students attending the charter school from that district in the 
current fiscal year.  
The sending district's total charter school tuition amount for purposes of the following 
paragraphs shall be the sum of the district's portion of tuition amounts for each charter school to 
which the district sends students, calculated using the provisions of this section; provided, 
however, that for the the purposes of calculating a district's total charter school tuition payment 
as a percentage of net school spending pursuant to subsection (i), the tuition amounts inclusive of 
both the district and state portions shall be used. The receiving charter school's total charter 

of 5 77 school tuition amount shall be the sum of the tuition amounts inclusive of both the district and 
state portions calculated for the charter school for each district sending students to the charter 
school. 
SECTION 10. Subsection (gg) of said section 89 of said chapter 71, as so appearing, is 
hereby amended by striking out the second sentence and inserting in place thereof the following 
3 sentences:-  
The district's reimbursement shall be 100 per cent of the increase in the year in which the 
increase occurs, 80 per cent of the increase in the year following the increase, 60 per cent of the 
increase in the second year following the increase, 40 per cent of the increase in the third year 
following the increase and 20 per cent in the fourth year following the increase.  
Annually, on a date to be established by the executive office for administration and 
finance, the department shall make a request to the governor and the general court for the full 
funding of this reimbursement and the reimbursement calculated under subsection (ff). If the 
general court does not fully fund the reimbursement account, the board shall not approve any 
application for a new charter school or a charter school expansion during the fiscal year in which 
the reimbursement account is underfunded.